Indiana, session 2026, HB1276.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 8-1-40.3 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW CHAPTER TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]:
Chapter 40.3. Competitive Electric Generation Service
Sec. 1. As used in this chapter, "affiliate" means a person that
directly, or indirectly through one (1) or more intermediaries,
controls, is controlled by, or is under common control with, a
specified person. The term includes a parent company or a
subsidiary.
Sec. 2. As used in this chapter, "commission" refers to the
Indiana utility regulatory commission created by IC 8-1-1-2.
Sec. 3. (a) As used in this chapter, "competitive electric
generation service" means the generation or procurement of
electricity for sale to end use customers by a retail electric
provider.
2026 IN 1276—LS 6905/DI 101


(b) The term does not include transmission and distribution
service.
Sec. 4. As used in this chapter, "default electric generation
service" means electric generation service provided by an
electricity supplier as a last resort to a customer that:
(1) receives electric utility service at a location within the
electricity supplier's assigned service area under IC 8-1-2.3;
and
(2) does not receive competitive electric generation service.
Sec. 5. As used in this chapter, "electricity supplier" means any
of the following that is under the jurisdiction of the commission for
the approval of rates and charges and that has an assigned service
area under IC 8-1-2.3:
(1) A public utility (as defined in IC 8-1-2-1(a)).
(2) A municipally owned utility (as defined in IC 8-1-2-1(h)).
(3) A corporation organized under IC 8-1-13.
(4) A corporation organized under IC 23-17 that is an electric
cooperative and that has at least one (1) member that is a
corporation organized under IC 8-1-13.
Sec. 6. As used in this chapter, "retail electric provider" means
a person that is licensed by the commission under this chapter to
provide competitive electric generation service.
Sec. 7. As used in this chapter, "transmission and distribution
service" means the delivery of electricity to a customer's service
location by an electricity supplier over the electricity supplier's
transmission and distribution systems.
Sec. 8. As used in this chapter, "unbundle" means to separate
the cost components of:
(1) electric generation services; and
(2) electric transmission and distribution services;
in an electricity supplier's tariffs.
Sec. 9. Not later than June 30, 2028, an electricity supplier shall
do the following:
(1) Unbundle the electricity supplier's tariffs for all customer
classes.
(2) Take appropriate internal measures to functionally
separate all:
(A) electric generation and supply services; and
(B) transmission and distribution services;
within the electricity supplier's operations.
(3) Divest the electricity supplier's generation assets not
otherwise needed to provide default electric generation
2026 IN 1276—LS 6905/DI 101


service to customers within the electricity supplier's assigned
service area under IC 8-1-2.3 after the implementation of
competitive electric generation service under section 10 of this
chapter. The electricity supplier may divest such generation
assets through either or both of the following methods, at the
discretion of the electricity supplier and subject to the
approval of the commission:
(A) Selling one (1) or more generation assets to one (1) or
more unaffiliated persons at fair market value.
(B) Transferring one (1) or more generation assets to one
(1) or more nonutility affiliates at fair market value.
Sec. 10. (a) Beginning:
(1) July 1, 2028, for industrial customers;
(2) January 1, 2029, for commercial customers; and
(3) July 1, 2029, for residential customers;
a customer of an electricity supplier may elect to receive
competitive electric generation service directly from a retail
electric provider, as set forth in this chapter and in rules adopted
by the commission under section 18 of this chapter.
(b) Except for the licensing requirements for retail electric
providers established by the commission under section 15 of this
chapter, competitive electric generation service is not subject to
regulation by the commission. However, the commission shall
continue to regulate:
(1) default electric generation service; and
(2) transmission and distribution service;
provided by an electricity supplier to customers within the
electricity supplier's assigned service area under IC 8-1-2.3.
(c) Notwithstanding any other law, rates charged by electricity
suppliers for default electric generation service must be:
(1) based on market prices; and
(2) subject to annual comparisons to regional averages for
comparable service.
Sec. 11. (a) Not later than January 1, 2027, the commission shall
initiate a stakeholder proceeding to develop a customer education
program to ensure that all retail electric customers of electricity
suppliers have access to accurate information about the availability
of, and options for, competitive electric generation service in
advance of the applicable dates set forth in section 10(a) of this
chapter for the specified customer classes. In conducting the
proceeding required by this subsection, the commission shall
consult with and invite comments from:
2026 IN 1276—LS 6905/DI 101


(1) electricity suppliers;
(2) retail electric providers offering competitive electric
generation service in other states;
(3) the office of the utility consumer counselor;
(4) associations or organizations representing utility
ratepayers;
(5) regional transmission organizations;
(6) utility regulatory commissions in other states that have
implemented competitive electric generation service;
(7) utility market analysts or other experts; and
(8) other interested stakeholders.
The proceeding shall explore the information necessary to enable
customers to make informed decisions with respect to competitive
electric generation service, along with the most effective means of
communicating, updating, and making such information easily
accessible to customers. In addition, the commission shall consult
with participating stakeholders in the development of the online
portal required under subsection (b).
(b) Not later than March 1, 2028, the commission shall establish
an online portal that enables customers of an electricity supplier to
compare competitive electric generation service offered by retail
electric providers within the electricity supplier's assigned service
area under IC 8-1-2.3, including information concerning a retail
electric provider's:
(1) contract terms;
(2) rates, including any time-varying price structures or rates,
such as time-of-use or off-peak pricing, critical peak pricing,
variable peak pricing, and real-time pricing offered by the
retail electric provider; and
(3) generation sources used to generate the electricity supplied
by the retail electric provider, regardless of whether the
electricity is self-generated by the retail electric provider or
procured through power purchase agreements.
(c) The commission shall update the information on the portal
established under subsection (b) as it approves new licenses for
retail electric providers under section 15 of this chapter and upon
receiving notice under section 15(5) of this chapter from a licensed
retail electric provider concerning any of the following:
(1) An increase in the rates and charges for, or a change in the
terms and conditions of, any competitive electric generation
service that the retail electric provider offers in any service
area in Indiana.
2026 IN 1276—LS 6905/DI 101


(2) Any new competitive electric generation service to be
offered by the licensed retail electric provider in any service
area in Indiana.
(3) The cessation of any competitive electric generation
service that the retail electric provider offers in any service
area in Indiana.
Sec. 12. (a) An electricity supplier shall continue to provide
metering services for a customer that elects to receive competitive
electric generation service from a retail electric provider. The
commission shall establish, in rules adopted under section 18 of this
chapter, requirements for an electricity supplier to provide to a
retail electric provider historical usage data for a customer that
seeks to receive competitive electric generation service from the
retail electric provider. The commission's rules must provide for
the following:
(1) Historical usage data for the customer must include:
(A) at least twenty-four (24) months of customer usage or
metering data; and
(B) other customer information necessary to facilitate
electric generation service transactions, including
customer class details such as capacity and transmission
allocations and loss factors.
If the customer has received electric generation service from
the electricity supplier for less than twenty-four (24) months,
the electricity supplier shall provide customer usage or
metering data for the length of time the customer has received
electric generation service from the electricity supplier.
(2) Historical usage data must include both:
(A) monthly usage totals; and
(B) hourly interval usage data, to the extent available;
delineated in terms of both kilowatt hour energy consumed
and kilowatt demand.
(3) For the duration of the time that a customer receives
competitive electric generation service from a retail electric
provider, the electricity supplier shall make available to the
retail electric provider such customer usage data as is
necessary to facilitate invoicing by the retail electric provider
in a timely manner.
(b) The requirements established by the commission under
subsection (a) must include a process by which a retail electric
provider may confirm and document a customer's consent to
release to the retail electric provider the customer usage data
2026 IN 1276—LS 6905/DI 101


described in subsection (a). The requirements must provide that an
electronic signature or another similar technology may be used in
confirming a customer's consent.
Sec. 13. (a) Subject to subsection (b), a customer of an electricity
supplier that receives competitive electric generation service from
a retail electric provider may elect to be billed through one (1) of
the following methods:
(1) A consolidated periodic bill that is provided by the
electricity supplier and that delineates as separate line items:
(A) charges for transmission and distribution service
provided by the electricity supplier; and
(B) charges for competitive electric generation service
provided by the retail electric provider.
(2) A consolidated periodic bill that is provided by the retail
electric provider and that delineates as separate line items:
(A) charges for competitive electric generation service
provided by the retail electric provider; and
(B) charges for transmission and distribution service
provided by the electricity supplier.
(3) A dual billing arrangement in which the customer receives
for the applicable billing cycle:
(A) a bill from the retail electric provider for competitive
electric generation service provided by the retail electric
provider; and
(B) a bill from the electricity supplier for transmission and
distribution service provided by the electricity supplier.
(b) The commission shall issue a general administrative order to
establish procedures to be followed by electricity suppliers and
retail electric providers so as to ensure that:
(1) a dual billing arrangement described in subsection (a)(3)
is available to customers not later than June 30, 2028; and
(2) the consolidated billing arrangements described in
subsection (a)(1) and (a)(2) are available to customers not
later than June 30, 2029.
Sec. 14. The commission shall issue a general administrative
order establishing procedures to ensure that the following
processes are implemented and available to customers not later
than December 31, 2029:
(1) An expedited retail electric provider change process that
enables residential customers to switch retail electric
providers within three (3) business days of receiving
confirmation of approved enrollment from the new retail
2026 IN 1276—LS 6905/DI 101


electric provider.
(2) A process that allows:
(A) residential customers; or
(B) small commercial or industrial customers;
that move from one (1) service location to another within their
electricity supplier's assigned service area under IC 8-1-2.3 to
have their competitive electric generation service transferred
directly to the new location without being required to switch
to default electric generation service provided by the
electricity supplier.
Sec. 15. The commission shall establish, in rules adopted under
section 18 of this chapter, a licensing process for retail electric
providers that seek to provide competitive electric generation
service to customers of electricity suppliers in Indiana. The
commission's rules establishing a licensing process must provide
for the following:
(1) Before issuing a retail electric provider a license to provide
competitive electric generation service, the commission must
find that the retail electric provider has the financial,
managerial, and technical ability necessary to provide
adequate competitive electric generation service to customers
of an electricity supplier.
(2) As a condition of receiving and maintaining a license, a
retail electric provider must do the following:
(A) Pay to the commission an initial licensing fee of ten
thousand dollars ($10,000).
(B) Execute and maintain a surety bond, or an equivalent
financial security instrument, that is:
(i) issued by a qualified surety, insurance company, or
other financial institution authorized to do business in
Indiana;
(ii) in the amount of not less than five hundred thousand
dollars ($500,000); and
(iii) paid by the retail electric provider.
The required surety bond or other financial security
instrument shall be conditioned upon the retail electric
provider's full and faithful performance of all duties and
obligations with respect to the provision of competitive
electric generation service in Indiana. In submitting an
application for a license to the commission, the retail
electric provider shall include a copy of the required surety
bond or other financial security instrument, including a
2026 IN 1276—LS 6905/DI 101


notarized verification from the issuer.
(C) Provide competitive electric generation service to a
customer in accordance with a written contract,
agreement, or arrangement executed by the retail electric
provider and the customer.
(D) Pay all applicable state taxes.
(E) Demonstrate the implementation of cybersecurity
protocols consistent with industry standards.
(F) Complete a commission approved training and
certification program in which a designated representative
of the retail electric provider must:
(i) complete an online course concerning the
commission's rules with respect to the sale and provision
of competitive electric generation service, including
applicable consumer protections; and
(ii) achieve a passing score on an online examination at
the conclusion of the course.
A designated representative of the retail electric provider
must complete the training and certification described in
this clause as a condition of initial licensure under this
section and as a condition of maintaining licensure
according to a schedule prescribed by the commission.
(3) The commission must issue an order approving or denying
a retail electric provider's application for a license not later
than ninety (90) days after the filing date of the application.
If the commission denies the application, the retail electric
provider may resubmit the application without prejudice
after curing any defects in the application identified by the
commission.
(4) A license issued under this section must be renewed every
two (2) years according to a schedule prescribed by the
commission. The commission may prescribe a license renewal
fee of not more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000).
(5) A licensed retail electric provider shall provide advance
notice to the commission and to the retail electric provider's
Indiana customers if the retail electric provider will do any of
the following:
(A) Increase the rates and charges for, or change the terms
and conditions of, any competitive electric generation
service that the retail electric provider offers in any service
area in Indiana.
(B) Offer new competitive electric generation service in
2026 IN 1276—LS 6905/DI 101


any service area in Indiana.
(C) Cease to offer any competitive electric generation
service that the retail electric provider offers in any service
area in Indiana.
The commission shall prescribe the timing and form of the
notice required under this subdivision. The commission shall
update the information on the online portal established under
section 11(b) of this chapter to reflect the changes set forth in
a notice provided under this subdivision.
(6) A licensed retail electric provider is subject to an annual
compliance and financial audit, according to a schedule
prescribed by the commission, to be performed by one (1) or
more independent auditors approved by the commission. The
audit must include an examination of the retail electric
provider's:
(A) financial stability;
(B) compliance history;
(C) cybersecurity protocols; and
(D) market practices.
The cost of the audit shall be paid by the retail electric
provider.
(7) Upon the completion of an audit under subdivision (6), the
commission may do one (1) or more of the following:
(A) Direct the retail electric provider to take such actions
as the commission determines necessary to correct or cure
any acts or practices examined as part of the audit and
found to be in violation of any provisions of state law or
the commission's rules and orders.
(B) Refer any suspected market manipulation,
anticompetitive or discriminatory practices, or unlawful
exercise of market power to the attorney general for
investigation.
(C) Refer any suspected criminal activities uncovered
during the audit to an appropriate law enforcement agency
or prosecutorial agency or official.
(8) The commission may:
(A) revoke or suspend a license issued under this section;
or
(B) place a licensed retail electric provider on
probationary status, which may include:
(i) enhanced oversight;
(ii) additional reporting requirements; or
2026 IN 1276—LS 6905/DI 101


(iii) submission to the commission of a plan for
corrective action;
for cause, including any violation of this chapter or rules
adopted by the commission under section 18 of this chapter.
Sec. 16. The commission may initiate an investigation to
consider, and establish guidelines for, the offering by retail electric
providers of additional services or programs in conjunction with
the provision of competitive electric generation service, such as:
(1) demand response programs;
(2) net metering programs;
(3) community solar programs;
(4) municipal aggregation programs;
(5) customer referral incentives; or
(6) other services, programs, or customer offerings.
Sec. 17. Beginning in 2029, the commission shall include in the
annual report that the commission is required to submit under
IC 8-1-1-14 before October 1 of each year the following
information as of the last day of the most recently concluded state
fiscal year:
(1) The total number of licensed retail electric providers
offering competitive electric generation service in Indiana.
(2) The total number of licensed retail electric providers
offering competitive electric generation service in each
electricity supplier's assigned service area under IC 8-1-2.3.
(3) For each electricity supplier:
(A) the total number of customers, broken down by
customer class, receiving competitive electric generation
service from a licensed retail electric provider; and
(B) the total load in megawatt hours associated with those
customers.
(4) The total amount of licensing fees collected from licensed
retail electric providers during the most recently concluded
state fiscal year.
(5) Any compliance or enforcement actions that were:
(A) initiated;
(B) pending; or
(C) closed;
with respect to retail electric providers during the most
recently concluded state fiscal year, including a description of
the resolution of any actions that were closed.
(6) The costs incurred by the commission in administering this
chapter during the most recently concluded state fiscal year.
2026 IN 1276—LS 6905/DI 101


(7) An analysis of the state of the retail electric service market
in Indiana and regionally.
(8) Any other quantitative or qualitative information that the
commission considers relevant for members of:
(A) the interim study committee on energy, utilities, and
telecommunications established by IC 2-5-1.3-4(8); and
(B) the general assembly;
to consider in evaluating competitive electric generation
service under this chapter.
Sec. 18. The commission shall adopt rules under IC 4-22-2 to
implement this chapter.
SECTION 2. [EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026] (a) The legislative
services agency shall prepare legislation for introduction in the
2028 regular session of the general assembly to make conforming
amendments to:
(1) Title 8 of the Indiana Code; and
(2) other provisions outside Title 8 of the Indiana Code;
as necessary to implement IC 8-1-40.3, as added by this act.
(b) This SECTION expires January 1, 2030.
2026 IN 1276—LS 6905/DI 101